Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 2
MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH PILOT PROGRAM

27-82-201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that facilities that provide treatment to individuals with a substance use disorder, including medication-assisted treatment, and clinics that provide obstetric and gynecological health-care services would better serve pregnant and postpartum women if the services could be coordinated and provided to women at the same location. It is the intent of the general assembly to fund a pilot program to integrate these health-care services at specified facilities and clinics and require the BHA to evaluate the pilot program and report the results of the pilot program to the general assembly.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2607, § 13, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1575, § 192, effective July 1.

27-82-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

(1.5) "Clinic" means a site that provides obstetric and gynecological health care.

"Licensed health-care provider" means a physician or physician assistant licensed pursuant to article 240 of title 12 or a nurse licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 255 of title 12.

"Pilot program" means the maternal and child health pilot program created in section 27-82-203.

"Treatment facility" means a health-care facility that provides substance use disorder or medication-assisted treatment and that is approved by the behavioral health administration pursuant to section 27-81-106.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2607, § 13, effective May 23.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1183), ch. 157, p. 705, § 68, effective July 1; (4) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1417, § 54, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

(1) and (4) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1575, § 193, effective July 1.

27-82-203. Maternal and child health pilot program - created - eligibility of grant recipients - rules - report.

There is created in the behavioral health administration the maternal and child health pilot program. The BHA shall administer the pilot program. The purpose of the pilot program is to:

Provide grants to two treatment facilities to facilitate the integration of obstetric and gynecological health care; and

Provide grants to four clinics to facilitate the integration of behavioral health, including substance use disorder treatment or medication-assisted treatment, into obstetric and gynecological health care at the clinics.

The BHA shall determine the criteria for treatment facilities and clinics to be eligible to receive the grants.

A treatment facility that is awarded a grant shall integrate prenatal, postpartum, and other health-care services delivered by licensed health-care providers into the services currently provided at the treatment facility.
(3) (a) (I) A treatment facility that is awarded a grant shall integrate prenatal, postpartum, and other health-care services delivered by licensed health-care providers into the services currently provided at the treatment facility.

A treatment facility that is awarded a grant may use the grant to hire clinical staff and to provide clinical updates, including training staff and upgrading and changing technology platforms to support integrated care, in order to perform obstetric and gynecological health care within the treatment facility. A treatment facility with low patient volume may partner with other treatment facilities and clinics to provide integrated care.

A clinic that is awarded a grant shall integrate behavioral health-care services provided by social workers and other behavioral health-care professionals licensed pursuant to article 245 of title 12, including mental health services, substance use disorder treatment, or medication-assisted treatment, into the health-care services currently provided at the clinic.

A clinic may use the grant for services including training clinical staff, upgrading and changing technology platforms to support integrated care, employing behavioral health-care providers, and coordinating and referring patients to behavioral health-care providers outside the clinic.

The state board of human services within the department of human services, in consultation with the BHA, may promulgate rules to implement the pilot program. The rules must include:

The procedures and timelines by which a treatment facility or clinic may apply for a grant;

Grant application contents; and

Criteria for determining eligibility for and the amount of each grant awarded to a treatment facility or clinic.

The commissioner of the BHA shall determine a process to evaluate the grant recipients and the integration of health care resulting from the pilot program. The BHA shall report the results of the pilot program to the public and behavioral health and human services and the health and insurance committees of the house of representatives and the health and human services committee of the senate, or their successor committees.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2607, § 13, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (2), IP(4), and (5) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1575, § 194, effective July 1.

27-82-204. Funding for pilot program.

For the 2021-22 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall appropriate money from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 (1) to the BHA to implement the pilot program. The BHA may use a portion of the money annually appropriated for the pilot program to pay the direct and indirect costs incurred to administer the pilot program.

If any unexpended or uncommitted money appropriated for a fiscal year remains at the end of that fiscal year, the BHA may expend the money in accordance with this section in the succeeding fiscal year without further appropriation.

The BHA may solicit, accept, and expend any gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources to implement or administer the pilot program.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2609, § 13, effective May 23.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2381, § 26, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1576, § 195, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-82-205. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2609, § 13, effective May 23.

L. 2021:

Entire section repealed, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2387, § 36, effective June 28.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.